Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-235
Election worker; notice of appointment.

(1) The county clerk shall, in writing, notify judges and clerks of election, district inspectors, members of counting boards, and members of canvassing boards of their appointment. The notice shall inform the appointee of his or her appointment and of the date and time he or she is required to report to the office of the county clerk or other designated location and the polling place. The notice shall be sent at least fifteen days prior to each statewide primary and general election and on or before the third Friday prior to each special election. The county clerk shall order the members of the receiving board to appear at their respective polling place on the day and at the hour specified in the notice of appointment.

(2) Each appointee shall, at the time fixed in the notice of appointment, report to the office or other location to complete any informational forms and receive training regarding his or her duties. The training shall include instruction as required by the Secretary of State and any other training deemed necessary by the county clerk.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 55;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 23;

Laws 1999, LB 802, § 5;

Laws 2002, LB 1054, § 14;

Laws 2007, LB646, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 16;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 6.
April 16, 2026